Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1212
Water well, defined.

Water well shall mean any excavation that is drilled, cored, bored, washed, driven, dug, jetted, or otherwise constructed for the purpose of exploring for ground water, monitoring ground water, utilizing the geothermal properties of the ground, obtaining hydrogeologic information, or extracting water from or injecting fluid as defined in section 81-1502 into the underground water reservoir. Water well shall not include any excavation described in subdivisions (1)(b) and (1)(c) of section 46-601.01.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 41;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 100;

Laws 2007, LB701, § 24.